<TEXT>CLEVELAND (AP) -- Now in double digits, the Cavaliers' winning streakis both intact and impressive.''We haven't done anything,'' he said. ''We haven't earned anything.Until we do something, then we can feel good about ourselves. But wehaven't done anything.''Kyrie Irving scored 24 points, James added 18 points and 11 assists,and Cleveland staggered to its 11th straight win, 97-84 over thePhiladelphia 76ers on Monday night.The winning streak is Cleveland's longest since reeling off 13 in arow - a franchise record - in 2010, the last season of James' firststint with the club. The Cavs had trouble putting away the youngSixers, who did all they could to stay close but don't have thefirepower to keep up with Irving, James and Co.With Atlanta's 19-game winning streak ending in a 115-100 loss to NewOrleans on Monday night, Cleveland is now the NBA's hottest team.That doesn't mean all that much to James.''The title is the ultimate goal, but we haven't played in a playoffseries together,'' he said. ''We haven't played in one playoff game,one playoff minute - that's when it really counts. You build yourhabits and progress over the regular season. But for us, we're a teamwe have a lot to make up and we can't be complacent. As fast as you goon an 11-game winning streak, you can go on an 11-game losingstreak.''Kevin Love added 15 rebounds and Matthew Dellavedova made three clutch3-pointers in the fourth quarter to help the Cavs, who led by 20 inthe third, avoid an upset. Love did not attempt a shot after the firstquarter and finished with just five points on 1-of-7 shooting. Hestayed on the floor more than an hour after the game with two Cavsassistant coaches working on his shot.Jerami Grant and Robert Covington scored 18 apiece for the Sixers, whobeat the Cavs last month when Cleveland was in disarray.The Cavs' biggest opponent may have been boredom as they playedlistlessly for long stretches against a young, but less talented team.Cleveland built its 20-point lead in the third quarter, but the Sixerswouldn't go away and pulled to 69-67 early in the fourth.Irving briefly restored order with a pair of 3-pointers, but theSixers rallied again and closed to 80-77 on Covington's 3.Irving, selected Eastern Conference player of the week earlier in the
day, then scored six of Cleveland's next eight points and Dellavedovadropped his second 3 of the period, giving the Cavs a 91-83 lead with2:36 left.Unlike James, Irving feels a greater sense of accomplishment as theCavs string wins together.''We take a lot of pride in it,'' he said. ''Obviously, you don't wantit to end and winning feels great and we want to continue with it. Wedon't want to be content with where we are, not be complacent, andjust work hard and do the things we need to do in order for us tocontinue this win streak.''</TEXT><TEXT>WASHINGTON (AP) -- Here's something you probably didn't see coming:The Charlotte Hornets are one of the hottest teams of the new year,even after losing Kemba Walker, while the Washington Wizards aresuddenly facing chemistry issues.Or, as coach Randy Wittman put it: ''We don't play hard anymore.''Charlotte's hot January carried over into Groundhog Day on Mondaynight with a 92-88 win over the Wizards. Al Jefferson had 18 pointsand 12 rebounds, and Michael Kidd-Gilchrist added 13 points and 13rebounds for the Hornets, who have won six of eight to work themselvesinto playoff position in the perpetually middling Eastern Conference.The Hornets went 10-4 in January, and are 5-1 without Walker, who hasa knee injury that will keep him sidelined at least six more weeks.His replacement, Brian Roberts was the leading scorer with 18 pointson Monday, and Gerald Henderson put in 17. Cody Zeller, who had acareer-high 21 points in the previous game, scored just two againstthe Wizards.''We have a couple of guys who are going to have to score everynight,'' Charlotte coach Steve Clifford said. ''Al's going to have toscore, I believe Gerald will score every night, and then I think it'llbe different guys different nights.''John Wall, who continues to battle a sprained right ankle andmigraine-like headaches that give him an aversion to bright light -not a good scenario for anyone in an NBA arena - scored 16 points on4-for-14 shooting with 10 assists for the Wizards, who have droppedthree straight and are 9-9 since late December.''The key to tonight was that we don't play hard anymore,'' Wittmansaid, his voice rising. ''That falls on me. I'll take that. We pointfingers, and until we all get on the same page and come out and play
hard for 48 minutes, and look at yourself in the mirror and say, 'Whatcan I do more?' rather than point our finger and say, 'It's not me,'that's where we are at. ... There are some good teams in this leaguethat can get away with maybe coasting for a half, but we are not oneof them.''Bradley Beal led Washington with 18 points and a season-high 11rebounds.''We are not hungry,'' Beal said. ''We are not the same team we werecoming into training camp and to start the year off. I don't think westill have that same heart and desire to prove ourselves and put teamsaway and show that we are still about business. I think we definitelytook several steps back in these last five games.''Wall, meanwhile, refused to use his maladies as an excuse. Once again,he averted his eyes from the television lights while speaking withreporters after the game.''When I step between those lines, I'm competing,'' Wall said. ''Idon't care what I'm going through. When I step between those lines, Iput the uniform on, no matter what I'm dealing with, I'm going to givemy best effort I can give.''The Wizards trailed by six with a minute to play, but Paul Pierce hita mid-range jumper and Wall converted a three-point play after a hard-collision with Jefferson while driving to the basket for a layup.Washington then forced a shot-clock violation with 22 secondsremaining, but Wall missed an open layup that would have cut the leadto one.Henderson and Roberts then each made a pair of free throws to put thegame away.</TEXT><TEXT>NEW YORK (AP) -- Between a seven-game losing streak at home and a 39-point humiliation in Los Angeles, the Brooklyn Nets had their choiceof lows in a lousy January.They've come to fight in February.Jarrett Jack made a tiebreaking jumper with 1.3 seconds left, and theNets used a late rally to beat the Clippers 102-100 on Monday night.''It's gratifying, I think, to go through the bumps and the bruisesand then to kind of get off the schneid in the fashion that we didagainst a really special team,'' Jack said.
The Nets erased a nine-point deficit in the final 1:35, getting two 3-pointers from Alan Anderson - one a four-point play - one from JoeJohnson and another from Deron Williams in his return from an 11-gameabsence.But they went to Jack for their final possession after Chris Paul'slayup tied it at 100 with 8.6 seconds to go. Jack dribbled right andlofted a jumper over 6-foot-11 center DeAndre Jordan, who had switchedonto him.Brook Lopez scored 24 points and Johnson had 22 for the Nets, whosnapped an overall four-game skid that finished a 3-12 January. Theywon at home for the first time since beating Sacramento on Dec. 29.''We just lost it,'' Paul said. ''I mean, not trying to take anycredit away from what they did and the shots they made, but we gavethe game away.''Jordan finished with 22 points, 20 rebounds and two made free throwsin 12 attempts for the Clippers. Paul had 20 points, eight reboundsand eight assists.The Clippers finished 8 of 25 (32 percent) from the free throw lineand dropped their seventh straight road game against the Nets, alosing streak covering seven-plus years and two states. Jamal Crawfordscored 18 points but was 7 for 22 from the field.The Clippers beat Brooklyn 123-84 in Los Angeles last month and itappeared they had finally done enough to win this one when a basket byMatt Barnes made it 96-87 with 1:46 remaining. But they failed to grabthe rebound when Johnson missed two free throws, and when the ball wastapped back out to him, he nailed a 3 that cut it to 98-96 beforeAnderson made a 3 from the corner while being fouled, putting the Netsin front 100-98.''We knew we had to make it a fight because we didn't want them tothink that that was us in L.A. So we made it a fight and we came outwith the win,'' swingman Alan Anderson said.Two nights after an impressive victory in San Antonio, the Clippersfell to 2-2 on their eight-game trip. They have dropped seven visitsin a row to the Nets since a Dec. 11, 2007, victory in EastRutherford, New Jersey.''We just didn't close the game out,'' Clippers coach Doc Rivers said.''We let them step into three 3s where that just can't happen.''Williams got a nice hand when he checked in during the first quarter,his first action since fracturing cartilage in his rib on Jan. 7. Hescored 15 points.
''Happy to be out there but more happy to get a win,'' Williams said.''We didn't get a win all of January at home, so this one felt reallygood.''</TEXT><TEXT>AUBURN HILLS, Mich. (AP) -- D.J. Augustin is flourishing in anexpanded role for the Detroit Pistons.Augustin had 25 points and 13 assists and the Pistons closed the firstquarter on a 25-1 run, going on to beat the Miami Heat 108-91 onTuesday night. Augustin has averaged 21.8 points and 9.2 assists infive games as Detroit's starting point guard since Brandon Jenningswent down with a ruptured Achilles tendon.''We're all great players in this league, but it is easier to getgoing when you know you are going to get a lot of minutes. You can getinto the rhythm of the game instead of having to play in bursts,''Augustin said. ''This was a team win. Everyone was running the floor,and everyone was playing defense and making shots.''Chris Bosh scored 34 points, including 21 in the third quarter, butnobody else provided much help offensively for Miami, which was stillwithout injured star Dwyane Wade. It was the first time in Bosh's fiveseasons with the Heat that they lost a regular-season game with himscoring at least 30 points. They had been 17-0.Andre Drummond had 14 points and 14 rebounds for the Pistons, andKentavious Caldwell-Pope scored 18. Greg Monroe had 12 points and ninerebounds.Detroit is now 2 1/2 games behind Miami and Charlotte, which occupythe last two playoff spots in the Eastern Conference.The Pistons struggled in the immediate aftermath of Jennings' injury,but they've steadied themselves with victories in the last two gamesover Houston and Miami. Detroit outscored the Heat 22-4 on fastbreaks, and Miami never completely recovered from its terrible finishto the first quarter.The Heat shot 5 of 22 from the floor in the first and trailed 33-12when it was over. The fast-break tally was 14-0 in Detroit's favor inthat period.''I thought our energy was really good, especially in the last sevenminutes of the first quarter,'' Pistons coach Stan Van Gundy said.''It was 11-11, and to go from there to 33-12 was probably the beststretch we've played all year.''
Miami cut the deficit to eight in the second, but the Pistons closedwith an 8-2 run and led 53-39 at halftime.Bosh scored 21 of Miami's first 25 points of the third, but the leadremained in double digits the whole quarter, and it was 85-67 afterthree.''Know what that shows you? One of our guys can have a great game, andif we don't defend, we have no chance to win,'' Miami coach ErikSpoelstra said.Chris Andersen scored 12 points for the Heat, and Hassan Whitesideadded 11 points and 10 rebounds.</TEXT><TEXT>PORTLAND, Ore. (AP) -- With Robin Lopez's return, the Trail Blazersseemed more at ease. Even a late threat from the Utah Jazz seemedsurmountable.''I think everybody was just more comfortable knowing he was outthere,'' said guard Damian Lillard, who had 25 points as Portland heldoff the Jazz 103-102.Lopez fractured his right hand in a Dec. 15 game against San Antonioand missed 23 games. The 7-foot-center was badly missed.''Not only does he help the starting unit, he just helps the team alltogether because it sets rotations. Everybody is back to what they'reaccustomed, where they've been playing for so long,'' Wesley Matthewssaid.Lopez's return, and the victory, came at the right time for theBlazers, who had lost three straight and five of their last six goinginto Tuesday night's game.After wrestling for the lead to start the fourth quarter, Matthews hittwo straight 3-pointers and the Blazers went up 98-89 with 3:26 left.Gordon Hayward's 3 closed the Jazz to within 99-96, but Lillardanswered with a driving layup. Joe Ingles hit another 3 for the Jazzto pull within 101-99 with 9.9 seconds left.LaMarcus Aldridge made free throws before Trey Burke hit a 3-pointerwith 0.9 seconds to go. Lillard missed his first free throw on theother end, then missed the second one intentionally and time ran outon Utah.
Aldridge finished with 22 points and 11 rebounds. Lopez had 11 pointsand six rebounds, held to just over 25 minutes on the floor.Hayward finished with 27 points for the Jazz, who were coming off110-100 victory over the Western Conference-leading Warriors.''We've gone from losing nine straight to being able to play with thebest teams in the league, so we've just got to figure out how to bemore consistent,'' Utah coach Quin Snyder said.Portland was coming off a 95-88 loss at Milwaukee on Saturday night,concluding a futile three-game road trip.Lopez, wearing a black wrap on his hand, made his first shot of thenight, a dunk. His return sparked the Blazers, who got off to a 27-23start after the first quarter.''Any basketball player would prefer to be on the court rather than onthe bench,'' Lopez said afterward.Nicolas Batum, who has been struggling with a sore wrist, hit a 3-pointer that made it 42-35, but the Jazz evened it up at 42 on TreyBurke's layup and a pair of free throws. Hayward's 3-pointer gave theJazz a 47-44 lead at the half.Portland regained a 57-50 lead early in the second on Lopez's layupand pushed the advantage to as many as 11 points. But the Jazzanswered with a 12-5 run to tie it at 62 after Hayward's layup.The Jazz responded to cut Portland's lead to 72-70 going into thefourth quarter. The two teams wrestled back-and-forth the rest of theway.''Even though tonight was a loss, we played really well, just notenough to win,'' Hayward said. ''So I think we try to learn from thisone.''</TEXT><TEXT>SACRAMENTO, Calif. (AP) -- Pick a category: Defense. Shooting. Ballmovement. Efficiency. Togetherness.In four games this season, the Golden State Warriors and SacramentoKings showed in just about every way how much of a difference there isbetween the NBA's Northern California clubs.Stephen Curry had 23 points and nine assists, and the Warriors rode a23-0 spurt in the first half to beat the Kings 121-96 on Tuesdaynight, sweeping the season series for the second straight year.
''They want to be all machos over there, but we just come out here andplay our game. We always come out with a win,'' said Warriors reserveMarreese Speights, who finished with 17 points and eight reboundsbefore fouling out.Golden State shut down Sacramento for more than seven minutes at theend of the first quarter and start of the second quarter to take an18-point lead. The Warriors went ahead by 21 at the half and 25 in thethird quarter, then held off a brief Kings comeback.Things got physical and feisty, at times, on the court. But none of itseemed to faze the visitors.The Warriors had 33 assists and 11 turnovers, while the Kings had 17assists and 18 turnovers. Golden State outshot Sacramento 50.5 percentto 44.3 percent and outscored Sacramento's bench 61 to 12.''I love the box score. I love having a lot of different guys scoringand not having all the points concentrated on a few guys,'' Warriorscoach Steve Kerr said. ''It just makes us hard to guard.''Sacramento snapped its eight-game losing streak with a win at Indianaon Saturday and had hoped to carry the momentum home.Instead, about the only thing the Kings accomplished was quieting KlayThompson - who had 14 points - after he scored an NBA-record 37 pointsin the third quarter and finished with 52 in Golden State's last gameagainst Sacramento on Jan. 23.DeMarcus Cousins had 26 points and 11 rebounds, and Rudy Gay scored 20for the Kings, who rallied within 11 late in the third quarter beforethe Warriors regrouped.''Basically, their bench came in and did a great job,'' Cousins said.''They pushed the game ahead and made it tough for our whole team.''It was quite a way for the NBA-leading Warriors (38-8) to begin astretch of four games in five nights, including three on the road. Inall, five of their last six games before the All-Star break are awayfrom home.Golden State fell behind 22-14 with 4:43 remaining in the firstquarter before smothering Sacramento (17-30) for a stunninglyprolonged stretch.The Warriors held the Kings scoreless for more than seven minutes andwithout a field goal for more than 8 1/2 minutes. Sacramento missed 10consecutive shots and committed five turnovers until Jason Thompson'sshort jumper with 9:38 left in the second quarter.
The Warriors rolled into the half up 63-42, kept their pace-and-spaceattack moving after the break and moved ahead by 25 points in thethird quarter.Cousins helped Sacramento slice that lead to 11 late in the thirdbefore the Warriors got hot again. Curry hit a 3-pointer in theclosing seconds of the quarter and the Warriors built back a big lead.</TEXT><TEXT>LOS ANGELES (AP) -- The Denver Nuggets are heading into the All-Starbreak feeling a bit better about themselves.Ty Lawson tied his season-highs with 32 points and 16 assists, leadingDenver to a 106-96 victory over the Los Angeles Lakers on Tuesdaynight that snapped the Nuggets' six-game skid.''That steak is going to taste a little bit better for a while untilwe get back to the grind,'' Lawson said.Darrell Arthur added 15 points, and Wilson Chandler and J.J. Hicksonhad 13 points each for the Nuggets, whose four-game road losing streakended.''We've been stuck in the mud for a while now, so it just feels goodto be back in the winning side,'' Denver coach Brian Shaw said,''especially the last game going into the break.''The Nuggets twice erased double-digit deficits.''It was tough, especially in the first half,'' Lawson said. ''Comingoff a back-to-back, everybody's legs were kind of dead. I mean, that'sno excuse, but a lot of our shots were short. We're a tough-mindedteam and we've been down a lot this year, so we've learned how to comeback and make a game of it.''Carlos Boozer scored 15 of his 21 points in the second half andgrabbed 10 rebounds, and Wayne Ellington added 18 points for theLakers, who fell to 0-5 this month.The Kobe Bryant-less Lakers were coming off an 0-4 trip during GrammyAwards week. Jeremy Lin and Wesley Johnson added 12 points each.''We got to stay positive,'' Lakers coach Byron Scott said. ''This isstill a work in progress.''The Lakers trailed for much of the fourth, when Hickson, Lawson and
Arthur did most of Denver's scoring. Leading by one, Arthur ran offseven straight to give the Nuggets an 86-79 lead. Randy Foye followedwith a 3-pointer and Lawson scored four straight, extending Denver'slargest lead to 10.Los Angeles rallied to get to 95-94 on six straight points, includingfour in a row by Johnson. But the Nuggets controlled the final 2 1/2minutes. Lawson scored 15 of their last 17 points and closed out thewin with a 3-pointer.''The last three or four minutes we have no confidence,'' Scott said.''We're just waiting for the wheel to fall off. Guys are looking atthe clock like, 'Please run out.'''Lawson sparked the Nuggets in the third, scoring 10 of their 12 pointsduring a 12-2 run that gave Denver a 63-61 lead. From there, neitherteam led by more than four. Nick Young scored the Lakers' last fourpoints to tie the game 71-all going into the fourth.''They got us on our heels and we didn't respond as well as we'dlike,'' Ellington said. ''We got to figure out how to close it out.We're ahead and we always find a way to let a team back in.''</TEXT><TEXT>PHOENIX (AP) -- The Houston Rockets blew an early 18-point lead andwere down by one after three quarters in Phoenix.Then, as he so often does, James Harden took over.The NBA's leading scorer got 20 of his 40 points in the fourth quarterand the Rockets pulled away to beat the Suns 127-118 on Tuesday night.''He made all the tough plays for his team, like all great playersdo,'' the Suns' Eric Bledsoe said. ''You know, he's in the running forMVP and he should be up there.''Josh Smith added 20 in the highest-scoring game of the season for theRockets, who trailed 89-88 at the end of the third.''That (game) had more twists and turns than an old country road,''Houston coach Kevin McHale said.Eric Bledsoe scored 32, one shy of his career high, for the Suns, whoenter the All-Star break losers of five of six. Bledsoe had 12 pointsin the fourth quarter.Harden - who will have his number retired by Arizona State on
Wednesday night - ended the first and second quarters with a 3-pointer, then opened the fourth with a four-point play that put theRockets ahead for good. He scored eight in a row during a 2 1/2 minutestretch late in the fourth.''James played really, really well,'' McHale said. ''He's been playingat a high level.''Harden has 85 points in his last two games. He scored 45 - one shy ofhis career high - in a loss to Portland on Sunday and has six games ofat least 40 points this season.''I mean, credit to my teammates,'' he said. ''They're doing a greatjob of setting screens and getting me open.''Harden came off the court with his left arm dangling in the thirdquarter but wasn't out of the game long.''I went to the basket pretty hard and all my weight went on myelbow,'' he said. ''But I'm all right. It went numb right away and Ihad some pain but I got the feeling back right away.''Houston, winner of seven of nine, has one game before the break,Wednesday night against the Clippers in Los Angeles.In the fourth quarter, Harden, the NBA's leading scorer at more than27 points per game, made seven of 10 shots - most on drives to thebasket, was 1 of 3 on 3-pointers, and sank all five of his freethrows. He also matched his season high with 12 rebounds in the game.The Rockets shot 75 percent (15 of 20) in the fourth.The 127 points were the most Phoenix has allowed in a non-overtimegame this season.Goran Dragic added 20 points for the Suns.With Phoenix leading 89-88 to start the fourth, Harden sank a 3 fromthe top of the key, fell on his behind, as he does on almost everyjumper, and Marcus Morris was called for the foul. Harden made thefree throw and the four-point play put Houston up by three.Bledsoe's 3 cut the Houston lead to 96-95, then Smith and Corey Brewermade 3s, Brewer scored on a rebound, Harden made three free throwsafter being fouled on a 3-point try, and the Rockets were up 104-95.Down by 18 at the end of the third quarter and nine at the half, theSuns opened the second half with a 20-3 outburst, including 16straight at one point. The Rockets missed nine shots in a row andBledsoe's 19-footer put the Suns up 81-73 with 5:38 left in the
quarter.Houston regrouped for a 15-5 run and Smith's dunk on a pass insidefrom Harden put the Rockets back on top 85-83.</TEXT><TEXT>CHARLOTTE, N.C. (AP) -- The Detroit Pistons may be 11 games under .500, but they're starting to think about the postseason - somethingthat is a very real possibility when playing in the EasternConference.''We're in the hunt right now,'' forward Greg Monroe said. ''We'rejockeying for position. There are a lot of games left but these arethe games with people right in front of us that mean a lot. Every gamewe have to come knowing that we are jockeying for position.''Monroe had 23 points and 12 rebounds, D.J. Augustin added 18 pointsand Detroit handed the Charlotte Hornets their third straight loss106-78 on Tuesday night.The Pistons are 16-9 over their last 25 games.Monroe, who had 14 double-doubles in January to tie a franchiserecord, was dominant inside and on the drive when the Pistons (21-32)built a 23-point lead at the end of the third quarter and were neverchallenged again.Monroe has recorded at least 20 points and 10 rebounds 48 times sincethe 2011-12 season, the most 20-10 games in the Eastern Conferenceduring that span. Andre Drummond had 14 points and nine rebounds asthe Pistons outrebounded the Hornets 48-38.Pistons coach Stan Van Gundy's game plan was to pack the low post andcontrol Jefferson and make the Hornets beat them from the outside.It appeared early on that strategy would backfire after the Hornetsknocked down 8 of 11 3-pointers in the first half. Rookie P.J.Hairston had 16 points on four 3s.''At that point you're sitting there saying, 'OK, great game plan.'You know?'' Van Gundy said. ''But we stayed with it and we did abetter job and they probably got a little tired as the game wore onand missed some shots. It ended up working out.''The Hornets would only make 1 of 13 3-pointers after intermission, andDetroit pulled away in the third, outscoring Charlotte 29-14 in thequarter.
Jefferson was held to 6 of 14 shooting.''That was just a great team defensive night,'' Monroe said.The Hornets had no answer for Monroe, who had 11 points in the thirdquarter.The Pistons scored 50 points in the paint and got to the foul line 30times. They made 27.''We were attacking the basket both on drives and post-ups,'' VanGundy said. ''If you're in the paint all the time then you have achance to get to the line.''Gerald Henderson had 17 points, and Al Jefferson added 13 points and10 rebounds for the Hornets (22-30).Charlotte enters the All-Star break on a three-game skid and in direneed of rest to get some players healthy.When they return, they will have Mo Williams running the offense. Theveteran point guard was acquired from Minnesota on Tuesday along withTroy Daniels in exchange for Gary Neal and a second-round draft pickin 2019.Williams will split time with Brandon Roberts while Kemba Walkercontinues to recover from knee surgery. The Hornets also expect to getMichael Kidd-Gilchrist and Bismack Biyombo back from injuries afterthe break.''When we get our full team back and get some of these guys back frominjuries, we'll be feeling good,'' Jefferson said. ''But the guys whoare here right here, right now got to do a good job and keep us in themix until we get our full team back.''</TEXT><TEXT>ATLANTA (AP) -- The Toronto Raptors proved they're a team to watch inthe Eastern Conference.They also showed once again they can beat the Atlanta Hawks - and inconvincing fashion.The matchup of the Eastern Conference's top teams turned into rout asToronto opened the second half of the season with a surprisinglylopsided 105-80 win over the Hawks on Friday night.Lou Williams had 26 points while making seven of 10 3-pointers and
DeMar DeRozan had 21 points for Toronto. The Raptors outscored theHawks 28-13 in the third quarter to turn a close game into a 23-pointlead.Atlanta still has a 5 1/2-game lead over Toronto in the EasternConference standings, but the Raptors won the season series 3-1. Noother team has two wins over the Hawks.Williams said the Raptors were motivated by Atlanta's similarlylopsided 110-89 win at Toronto on Jan. 16.''We were embarrassed on our home court so we wanted to come out andplay with that on our mind,'' Williams said.The Raptors won with defense. Williams had four of Toronto's 15 steals- matching the team's season high. The Raptors blocked nine shots.''We were scrambling,'' said DeRozan, who had three steals. ''We triednot to let them get anything easy. We didn't want to let them getgoing, get a rhythm. As long as we do that, we can live with theoutcome.''Hawks coach Mike Budenholzer said the Raptors ''really took it tous.''Atlanta's Al Horford said the Hawks wouldn't be worried about amatchup with Toronto if the teams meet in the playoffs.''No. Give them credit, they're a great team,'' Horford said. ''Butwe're a confident group.''The Hawks have lost four of seven following a team-record 19-gamewinning streak.The Hawks and Raptors set team records for wins before the All-Starbreak, and neither made moves before Thursday's trade deadline.Toronto backed up that show of confidence in the final regular-seasonmeeting of the clubs.The Raptors stretched their 49-45 halftime lead with a dominant thirdquarter. Atlanta made only three of 19 shots. Kyle Korver had a dismalperiod, missing all five of his shots while committing two turnovers.Budenholzer turned the game over to backups such as Mike Muscala, JohnJenkins and Shelvin Mack for much of the final period.</TEXT><TEXT>ORLANDO, Fla. (AP) -- In the games leading up to former coach Jacque
Vaughn's firing earlier this month, the Orlando Magic looked lost onthe defensive end of the floor.So far, interim coach James Borrego is keeping true to his promise tomake the rest of the season all about defense.The Magic held the New Orleans Pelicans to 13 points in the fourthquarter and 37 points in the second half on their way to a 95-84victory on Friday night.Victor Oladipo had 22 points. Nik Vucevic had 18 points and 13rebounds, and Evan Fournier scored 16.''Protecting our paint is the biggest thing, contesting every shot andhelping each other,'' Oladipo said. ''We're just buying into it rightnow.''It was the fifth straight opponent the Magic have held to under 100points. Orlando had surrendered 100 or more points in 14 consecutivegames prior to this improved streak.It also marks the first time the Magic have posted back-to-back winssince Jan. 14.Orlando trailed by four at the half, but used a 9-0 run early in thefourth quarter to take control. The Magic are now 3-2 under Borrego.''In the second half we got back to what we do. Guys were helping eachother and we did a good job on the boards and the big guys areprotecting the paint,'' said Magic guard Elfrid Payton.Tyreke Evans led New Orleans with 14 points and 10 assists. AnthonyDavis added 13 points and 11 rebounds in his return from a rightshoulder injury.The rust showed at times for both Davis and for Ryan Anderson, whomissed two games with a right elbow strain. Anderson had 13 points in27 minutes.Davis in particular had a sluggish start, committing all four of histurnovers in the first half, and showing moments of timidity on bothends of the floor.The Magic took advantage, outscoring the Pelicans 64-36 in the paint.Orlando also tried to give Davis several different defensive looks,going six players deep into their bench.After Anderson started the fourth quarter with a jumper to tie thegame at 73, the Magic scored nine straight - including seven by Willie
Green - to take a 82-73 lead. It would grow as high as 89-75 with 5:19remaining on a dunk by Oladipo.The Pelicans didn't get closer than nine the rest of the game.</TEXT><TEXT>MILWAUKEE (AP) -- With their roster altered by a trade and theirrhythm disrupted by the All-Star break, the Milwaukee Bucks got a joltfrom a big man against Denver.Forward John Henson exposed the Nuggets in the paint to give his teama much-needed lift.Henson scored 14 points on 6-of-8 shooting, Khris Middleton had 15points and the Bucks beat Denver 89-81 on Friday night in their firstgame since tweaking their roster at the NBA trade deadline.The athletic Henson had four buckets during a 20-7 run over the last 7minutes of the third quarter to help put Milwaukee ahead for goodafter trailing the entire first half.At halftime, the talk in the locker room was about adjusting to findplayers rolling to the bucket.''In coverage, the roll guys will be open. I was just finishing, doingwhat I was supposed to do and we got the lead,'' Henson said.Wilson Chandler led Denver with 19 points, while Jusuf Nurkic had 11points and 15 rebounds. Denver stayed within a possession or two formuch of the fourth quarter, but went 1 of 5 from the field with aturnover in the last 3:26.''They got up on us at every position. They contested every pass, theychallenged us off the dribble and daring us to beat them,'' coachBrian Shaw said.It didn't happen, and Denver was saddled with its 14th loss in 16games.The Bucks won their fourth straight game and held Denver to 35 percentshooting, including 31 percent (5 of 16) in the fourth quarter.Michael Carter-Williams, who was acquired from Philadelphia as part ofa three-team deal that sent Brandon Knight to Phoenix, did not playbecause of a sprained right big toe.They didn't need him as the Nuggets went cold in the second half.
After going 5 of 6 from the field to start the third period, Denverwent on a 5-of-24 spurt that helped contribute to Milwaukee's second-half surge.''We just didn't move the ball. Sometimes that happens,'' Nurkic said.Henson, a 6-foot-11 forward with a long wingspan, led the way in thepaint and energized the team with a reverse and two dunks during therun.Denver drew within 74-71 with 9:35 left in the game on DaniloGallinari's 3 from the corner. But the Bucks defense came through withless than 2 minutes left, and Middleton hit an open 3 from the cornerwith 1:24 left to give the Bucks a 10-point lead.''This game is about rhythm. But we found a way to get stops when wehad to, came up with some big rebounds in the second half,'' coachJason Kidd said.</TEXT><TEXT>SACRAMENTO, Calif. (AP) -- In good times and bad, Tony Parker's playhas often been cited as a way to measure the state of the San AntonioSpurs during the last decade.Parker has no problem with that responsibility. He expects to lift theSpurs to the same level he has during four of their five NBAchampionship runs, and he fully acknowledges - healthy or not - hehasn't always lived up to his high standard this season.Parker began to break of his recent slump Friday night, helping theSpurs snap a four-game losing streak with a 107-96 victory over theshort-handed Sacramento Kings. He sparked the decisive run in thefourth quarter and finished with 19 points, five rebounds and fourassists.''You just have to man up and keep playing,'' Parker said, adding thathe had a ''great talk'' with coach Gregg Popovich a day earlier thathelped him refocus.Kawhi Leonard added 17 points and seven rebounds as San Antonioavoided its first five-game skid since late in the 2010-11 season withan efficient and aggressive performance.The Spurs had just six turnovers and made 29 of 32 free throws,offsetting a night in which they shot below 40 percent from the floor.They credited the steady steering to their 32-year-old point guard,
who has been slowed by a hamstring injury.''That was huge for us. That was huge for him,'' said Spurs stalwartTim Duncan, who had 12 points and six boards. ''I know he's beenreally hard on himself over these last couple games and reallystruggling, and hopefully that builds the confidence he needs and thatwe need him to have.''Kings center DeMarcus Cousins sat out with a sprained left ankle andbruised left hip, and point guard Darren Collison missed his eighthconsecutive game as he prepares to have surgery on a core muscleinjury that will sideline him at least another month.Sacramento still showed plenty of fight under new coach George Karl.Ben McLemore scored 21 points, Ray McCallum had 20 and Rudy Gay added16 for the Kings, who were coming off an impressive home win overMemphis on Wednesday night.Sacramento shot 48 percent but had 17 turnovers against the Spurs. TheKings also finished 1 of 4 from 3-point range, while San Antonio shot8 for 23 from beyond the arc.Sacramento started strong and stayed close until the Spurs pulled awaybehind one big burst. Parker scored 11 points in the fourth quarter,and Manu Ginobili hit a 3-pointer and a pair of free throws to cap a16-4 spurt that put the Spurs up 100-88 with 4:06 to play.''I just think the effort, the energy and the intensity we had wasfirst class,'' Karl said. ''But the basketball IQ in the fourthquarter? I am not saying it was bad, but it sure wasn't good.''Karl warned his team to treat San Antonio as the defending NBAchampions and not a team on a four-game skid in February. Karl evensuggested the Spurs were ''playing possum,'' saying San Antonio hasgone through regular-season slumps before only to roll through theplayoffs.That was certainly the way things played out.Sacramento surged ahead 20-10 behind a streaky shooting start. TheSpurs struggled to find their stroke, but they never let the Kingsstretch their lead.San Antonio stayed aggressive, consistently getting to the free throwline and getting Carl Landry - who started in Cousins' place - to pickup his fourth foul late in the second quarter. The Spurs ended thehalf with a flurry, going ahead 49-46 at the break despite shootingjust 34.8 percent.
The teams traded scores most of the third quarter. San Antonio led80-78 entering the fourth, when Parker & Co. pulled away for good.</TEXT><TEXT>PORTLAND, Ore. (AP) -- After the Portland Trail Blazers overcameRussell Westbrook's third straight triple-double, Damian Lillardsensed his team was recapturing its form of earlier this season.Oklahoma City can only hope it didn't lose Westbrook along with thegame.Lillard and LaMarcus Aldridge each scored 29 points and Portlandrallied to beat the Oklahoma City Thunder 115-112 Friday night.Aldridge added 16 rebounds.''I think it was one of those games where we turned back intoourselves and late in the game we found a way to get stops. We madeplays, made shots and we stayed the course over kind of a roughgame,'' Lillard said.Westbrook, who fell and was hit in the face by the knee of onrushingteammate Andre Roberson in the final seconds, had 40 points, 13rebounds and 11 assists. He became the first player to string togetherthree triple-doubles since LeBron James in 2009.Westbrook, who had a noticeable imprint on his right cheek, did notspeak to reporters following the game while he was evaluated. Therewas no immediate word on his condition.The Blazers overcame a 15-point, third-quarter deficit and tied it ona tip shot by Aldridge with 4:33 to go.Rookie Mitch McGary came off the bench for a season-high 20 points -12 in the third quarter alone - for the Thunder.Portland took the lead with 3:56 left on Arron Afflalo's 3-pointer.Aldridge and Westbrook traded baskets down the stretch before Aldridgemade a free throw to put Portland up 111-110 with 44 seconds to go.Afflalo's free throws made it 113-110 and Wesley Matthews' attempt tointentionally foul Westbrook was ruled a shooting foul on a 3-pointer.Westbrook missed the first and Lillard made free throws with 1.4seconds left for the final margin.The Blazers, who earlier in the season led the Western Conference, are9-2 at the Moda Center this season in games they've trailed in thethird quarter.
Westbrook was hit in the face in the scramble following his freethrows.''The guy has the heart of a champion,'' coach Scott Brooks said. ''Hecomes out every night. There are no excuses ever. He plays the gamewith everything he has.''The Thunder were coming off a 117-113 overtime loss the night beforein Phoenix, snapping their seven-game winning streak. Westbrook had 39points, 14 rebounds and 11 assists, and rolled his ankle late in thegame.The Thunder were playing without Kevin Durant and Enes Kanter becauseof injuries. Brooks wasn't certain how long Kanter will be out, sayinghe believed the injury occurred in the second half of the loss to theSuns.Westbrook's facial injury, if serious, would be a devastating blow.Trailing the Thunder 59-47 at the break, the Blazers opened the secondhalf with a 7-0 run to close within 59-54. Oklahoma City answered witha 10-0 run capped by Serge Ibaka's dunk to go up 69-54, and led 89-78going into the final quarter.''We never believe that we're out of it,'' Aldridge said. ''Weunderstand that if we turn up our defense and we play at a differentlevel that we're capable, anything is possible.''</TEXT><TEXT>CHICAGO (AP) -- Derrick Rose had knee surgery Friday morning. PauGasol was sidelined by an illness, and Taj Gibson sprained his leftankle in the first quarter.No problem for the Chicago Bulls, who turned to their emerging starand skilled center for a short-handed victory.Jimmy Butler had 28 points and 12 rebounds in Chicago's 96-89 win overthe Minnesota Timberwolves, and Joakim Noah finished with 11 points,12 rebounds and eight assists in a solid all-around performance.''It is hard, but we have enough bodies and weapons on our bench towhere guys can mix and match and play different positions and guarddifferent positions,'' Butler said.The Bulls won for the seventh time in their last nine games. Mike
Dunleavy made five 3-pointers on his way to 21 points, and reserveTony Snell added 12 points.''Whoever we have out there, just get the job done,'' coach TomThibodeau said.Kevin Martin scored 18 points for the Timberwolves, who have lost fourof six to drop to 13-44. Ricky Rubio had 15 points and 10 assists, andAndrew Wiggins finished with 14 points.Minnesota was hurt by a whopping 48-16 deficit in points in the paint.''I thought we played hard defensively,'' coach Flip Saunders said.''For the Bulls, they have All-Stars who performed down the stretch.Butler made plays and Noah made plays and that's what you want yourAll-Stars to do.''The Bulls trailed 85-84 before Kirk Hinrich drove inside for a layupwith 4:29 remaining, and then Snell made a smart pass to Dunleavy foran open 3 that made it 89-85. Butler added a clutch bank shot to helpChicago improve to 10-1 in its last 11 games against Minnesota.''It was a great win for us, with all the guys out and what we havebeen through this week,'' Dunleavy said.It was Chicago's second game since the team announced Tuesday nightthat Rose had a medial meniscus tear in his right knee. The dynamicpoint guard walked out of the hospital following his surgery and isexpected to be sidelined for four to six weeks, raising thepossibility he could return this season.It was an encouraging development for the Bulls, who were stillprocessing another significant injury for the 2011 NBA MVP when theylost 98-86 to Charlotte on Wednesday night. Rose missed the 2012-13season while he recovered from left knee surgery, and played in just10 games last season before he had surgery on his right knee.''He's a tough-minded guy,'' Thibodeau said. ''There's normal emotionwhen you get injured and then there's the fight in him that I thinkwe've all seen. He's not going to back up and he'll put everything hehas into the rehab and then coming back.''Thibodeau said he doesn't know if Gasol or Gibson will be availableSunday against the Los Angeles Clippers. Gibson was limping badly inthe locker room after the game and has had periodic trouble with thesame ankle for a while.</TEXT>
<TEXT>AUBURN HILLS, Mich. (AP) -- After a terrible start to the season, theDetroit Pistons have worked their way back into the Eastern Conferenceplayoff race.Losses like this may keep them on the outside looking in.Shane Larkin's three-point play in the final minute of the secondovertime helped the New York Knicks snap their eight-game losingstreak with a 121-115 victory over the Pistons on Friday night -Detroit's latest ugly loss at the Palace to a team around the bottomof the standings.The Pistons have lost at home to each of the league's five worstteams: New York, Philadelphia, Minnesota, the Los Angeles Lakers andOrlando.''We've had a lot of these games,'' coach Stan Van Gundy said. ''Ifyou aren't going to play defense and rebound, that's going tohappen.''Larkin put the Knicks ahead by four with 28 seconds remaining, andthey held on to win a game that Detroit appeared to have control ofafter two quarters. The Pistons led by 18 in the second and by 12 atthe half but blew what looked to be an easy game against the team withthe NBA's worst record.''The whole second half and overtime were terrible. That's the secondgame in a row where our starters have come out for the second half andnot been any good,'' Van Gundy said. ''We didn't even try defensively,so it was easy for them to get back into the game.''Detroit squandered a five-point lead in the final minute ofregulation, allowing the Knicks to tie it at 95 it on a pull-up 3-pointer by Langston Galloway with 6.3 seconds remaining.''I looked up at the clock, it was just running down,'' Galloway said.''It's only me, and I think there was two other defenders going downcourt, and I just pulled up.''With the Pistons down 105-103 late in the first overtime, Detroit'sGreg Monroe scored while drawing a foul with 12 seconds left, but hemissed the ensuing free throw.Monroe and the Pistons would go on to miss several more crucial freethrows in the second overtime. With Detroit down 119-114 with 8seconds remaining, Jodie Meeks was fouled while shooting a 3-pointer.Meeks, who had made 32 consecutive free throws to that point, missed
two of three.Andrea Bargnani scored 25 points for the Knicks. Lou Amundson added 17points and 14 rebounds. New York won for the first time in 17 gameswithout Carmelo Anthony (left knee surgery) this season. The Knickswere also without guard Jose Calderon, who was out with a sore leftAchilles.''No matter what happened the night before, they're coming back withthe right effort and playing with the right mindset,'' Knicks coachDerek Fisher said. ''That's the only way you can win a game liketonight. As coaches we're happy for our players more than anything,because they need some positive feedback from the effort they putin.''Monroe had 28 points and 13 rebounds for Detroit, and Andre Drummondadded 21 points and 15 rebounds.</TEXT><TEXT>HOUSTON (AP) -- Terrence Jones isn't where he was before an extendedabsence because of a leg injury.But if Friday night is any indication, he's getting pretty close.Jones scored a season-high 26 points, James Harden made thetiebreaking free throw with 43 seconds left and followed that with ajumper, and the Houston Rockets beat the Brooklyn Nets 102-98.Jones also led the Rockets with 12 rebounds, in his 11th game backsince missing almost three months with nerve inflammation in his leftleg.''I still have a little bit of issues here now and then, but right nowI'm feeling very comfortable out there, just bringing a lot of energyand I think it's helping out the team a lot,'' Jones said.Coach Kevin McHale was impressed with his work on Friday night.''He had some good putbacks and finished around the basket,'' McHalesaid. ''He's looking good and we needed that tonight.''Harden, who played after spraining his right ankle on Wednesday night,shot just 4 for 15 for 15 points, but had 12 assists in a game wherefive Rockets scored in double figures.''The beauty of this team is that we've been good battling adversity
all year,'' Harden said. ''This is another case where we didn't let itget to us, we just stayed relaxed and made the right plays down thestretch.''The Rockets won their fourth straight overall and have defeated theNets eight straight times in Houston.Mason Plumlee and Deron Williams had 15 points apiece for the Nets.''We felt like we kind of gave that one away,'' Williams said. ''Thatwas our game to have and we just made a couple of mistakes and wedidn't get a stop when we needed it.''The game was tied with 43.6 seconds left when rookie Markel Brownfouled Harden away from the ball before Houston got the ball in aftera timeout, and he made the free throw.Harden then crossed Brown over and stepped back to hit a jump shot tomake it 98-95, smiling broadly and doing a little shoulder shake tocelebrate the basket.Williams made a layup to cut Houston's lead to one, but Jason Terrymade a pair of free throws to push it to 100-97. Joe Johnson made afree throw for Brooklyn after that, but Jones made two free throws tosecure the victory.The Nets were up by five after a tip-in by Brook Lopez with 2 1/2minutes left before a basket by Jones and a 3-pointer by Pat Beverleytied it at 95.Houston led by a point early in the fourth quarter when Alan Andersongot the Nets going, scoring the first five points of a 9-0 run thatmade it 86-78 with 7 minutes left.The Rockets broke an almost four-minute scoring drought on a basket byDonatas Motiejunas with 6 minutes remaining and Trevor Ariza's 3-pointer a few seconds later cut Brooklyn's lead to 86-83.Brooklyn scored five quick points to stretch the lead to eight beforeHouston used a 7-2 spurt, capped by a three-point play by Ariza, toget within 93-90 with 3 minutes left.Brooklyn was up by five with about 5 minutes left in the first halfbefore Houston used an 8-2 run to take its first lead of the game at51-50. The Nets closed the quarter with a 7-2 run to take a 57-53 leadat halftime.</TEXT><TEXT>CHICAGO (AP) -- Joakim Noah's emotions after he heard Derrick Rose will have yet another knee surgery could be summed up in two words.

''Angry. Sad,'' Noah said.

The news that Rose is out again hit the Chicago Bulls hard. And they didn't get much relief from the Hornets.

Michael Kidd-Gilchrist had 18 points and 12 rebounds, Mo Williams scored 17 and Charlotte beat Chicago 98-86 Wednesday night.

Al Jefferson added 16 points to help the Hornets snap a five-game losing streak. But all that was overshadowed by the news that Rose needs another operation.

''For them, I would think that, mentally, there's no question it will take a few games to get used to playing without him,'' Charlotte coach Steve Clifford said.

The Bulls revealed Tuesday night that their star point guard has a torn meniscus in his right knee, a big blow to the franchise and its fan base. That fueled more doubts about whether the 2011 NBA MVP will ever be the same, let alone lead Chicago to its first championship since the Michael Jordan-Scottie Pippen era.

A similar injury limited Rose to 10 games last season and cut short his long-awaited comeback. He sat out the 2012-13 season recuperating from a torn ACL in his left knee. It's not clear exactly when he will have surgery or how much time he will miss.

''We all were affected by it,'' Pau Gasol said. ''They might have been through this before, but it's the third time it's happened.''

It's an all-too-familiar feeling for Chicago, which dropped into a tie with Cleveland for the Central Division lead. The Bulls had won six of seven, but clearly, there was a hangover from the news about their point guard.

Gasol, who came to Chicago hoping to make a run at a championship after winning two with the Lakers, led the Bulls with 25 points and 13 rebounds for his league-leading 38th double-double. He also had four blocks.

Jimmy Butler scored 14. Aaron Brooks, starting for Rose, was off target in a 12-point performance. He was 4 of 12 from the field, including 1 of 5 on 3-pointers, and 3 for 8 at the free throw line. The Bulls were 3 of 17 from long range and 15 of 23 at the foul line.

Kidd-Gilchrist capped a seven-point spurt with a pair of dunks, making it 85-74 midway through the fourth quarter. Jefferson scored six in an 8-0 run that boosted the lead to 95-78 with 2:25 left.

''We've got a good group of guys,'' Williams said. ''The coaching staff has been great, and my teammates have been great. I enjoy playing with these guys, and they enjoy playing with me. I can tell winning is a priority, and that makes things more significant and fun.''
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
ORLANDO, Fla. (AP) -- It will be a while before the Miami Heat fully figure out how they will adjust without Chris Bosh in the lineup.

In the meantime, they're continuing to find different ways to win.

Luol Deng had 21 points, Dwyane Wade added 18 and the Heat rallied to defeat the Orlando Magic 93-90 in overtime Wednesday night.

Hassan Whiteside added 15 points and 13 rebounds. The Heat have won three of four since losing Bosh for the season with a blood clot in his lung.

''The ball wasn't going in for anybody, but you've got to keep shooting and just hope that the basketball gods change their mind,'' Wade said. ''And they did that for us.''

The Magic squandered an eight-point lead with less than a minute play in the fourth quarter, allowing the Heat to send the game to extra time.

Wade had four points in the period, and new acquisition Goran Dragic connected on two game-sealing free throws.

Nik Vucevic had all five of the Magic's points in overtime, and finished with 26 points and eight rebounds. Victor Oladipo had 13 points and a career -high 13 rebounds.

But Orlando struggled from the free throw line, going just 18 for 31 for the game. There were also some shaky late-game possessions and turnovers that allowed Miami to stay in the game.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
ATLANTA (AP) -- Atlanta backup point guard Dennis Schroder again shined against a Dallas team that was missing its starting point guard.

Led by Schroder's 17 points, the Hawks took the lead with a 13-0 run in the third quarter and went on to a 104-87 victory Wednesday night over the Mavericks, who were without suspended guard Rajon Rondo.

Schroder, the second-year player from Germany, made three of five 3-pointers. He also led Atlanta with a career-high 22 points in a 105-102 win at Dallas on Dec. 22.

''People are going to start learning he can shoot the ball and do a lot of things,'' Atlanta's Al Horford said.

The Mavericks suspended Rondo before the game for conduct detrimental to the team. Rondo had a heated exchange on the court with coach Rick Carlisle in the third quarter of Tuesday night's win over Toronto.

Carlisle said the one-game suspension was an ''organizational decision'' and said Rondo will start in the Mavericks' next game against Brooklyn on Saturday.

Schroder led six Atlanta players in double figures.

''I thought Dennis early, middle and late was a big factor,'' Hawks coach Mike Budenholzer said. ''He hit shots. He guarded. I thought he did a lot of things well. We needed him tonight.''

The Eastern Conference-leading Hawks have won two straight.

Monta Ellis led Dallas with 19 points.

Rondo's suspension left the Mavericks with only 11 players. Center Tyson Chandler (hip contusion) and forward Chandler Parsons (left ankle) were held out with injuries. Forward Amare Stoudemire was rested with the team playing on back-to-back days.
</TEXT>



<TEXT>
BOSTON (AP) -- The recently reshuffled Boston Celtics hadn't practiced lately and it showed early in Wednesday's game against the New York Knicks.

Midway through the third quarter, the Celtics got in sync and turned a six-point deficit into a 115-94 rout of the reeling Knicks.

''We just kept rocking,'' said Evan Turner, who had his first career triple-double with 10 points, 12 rebounds and 10 assists. ''We made a lot of great plays to start that fourth quarter as a team. We got the energy going.''

Boston's top three scorers were all picked up in trades over the past few months. Isaiah Thomas scored 19, hitting all 11 of his foul shots, and Jonas Jerebko had 20 points as both played their first home games as members of the Celtics. Jae Crowder, acquired from Dallas in the Rajon Rondo deal on Dec. 18, finished with 18 points.

''We've got a lot of talented guys,'' Thomas said. ''Coach's offensive system is freedom for everybody and he wants everybody to have confidence and attack.''

Boston hit 14 3-pointers, including eight in the fourth quarter to put away the Knicks and extend New York's losing streak to eight.

Coach Brad Stevens said he's still learning what he has with the recent additions, but was impressed with what Boston accomplished with a smaller lineup.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
NEW ORLEANS (AP) -- As Quincy Pondexter saw his 3-pointer go down with 49.9 seconds on the clock, he turned up court, allowed a slight smile and pounded his chest with the palm of his hand three times.

The clutch basket as the shot clock wound down gave Pondexter a career-high 25 points and all but sealed New Orleans' third straight victory, a 102-96 win over the Brooklyn Nets on Wednesday night.

''That's probably why a little emotion came out,'' Pondexter said. ''It was a dagger.''

Tyreke Evans had 15 points and 11 assists for the Pelicans, who have for all practical purposes posted their past three victories without All-Star Anthony Davis.

Davis sprained his right shoulder in the first quarter of New Orleans' victory in Miami on Saturday night and has not suited up for either of the Pelicans past two games against Toronto and Brooklyn.

New Orleans was also without two other top players: forward Ryan Anderson (sprained right knee) and point guard Jrue Holiday (lower right leg injury).

''Missing Ryan, missing A.D., missing Jrue - those are great young players,'' Pondexter said. ''We're in a playoff chase and I had to step up.''

The victory left New Orleans two games behind Oklahoma City for the last playoff spot in the Western Conference.
</TEXT>



<TEXT>
HOUSTON (AP) -- James Harden started his career as the sixth man for the Oklahoma City Thunder.

He's been a starter since coming to Houston, but with his history he still delights in seeing the guys off the bench playing as they did in the Rockets' 110-105 win over the Los Angeles Clippers on Wednesday night.

''Our starters didn't have a really good game up until the fourth quarter, but our bench gave us life,'' Harden said. ''Our bench just took over, and that was the key to the game right there.''

Harden had 21 points, Corey Brewer scored 13 of his 20 points in the fourth quarter and the Rockets snapped a six-game skid to the Clippers with the victory.

It's Houston's first victory over Los Angeles since March 30, 2013, and just the second win in the past 13 meetings with the Clippers.

The Rockets opened the fourth quarter with a 15-1 run to take a 99-86 lead. With the second unit in, Brewer starred in that stretch, scoring 10 points, with two 3-pointers.

Brewer, who was traded from Minnesota in December, takes pride in being a spark off the bench.

''That's what they brought me here to do, come off the bench and bring energy,'' he said. ''I score. I run. I play defense. Whatever it takes to win.''

Houston didn't trail after that, but a 7-0 run by the Clippers got them within four points with 37.8 seconds left. Chris Paul fouled Harden hard after that and the two were separated after Harden stood inches away from him and yelled.

Harden made one of two free throws to make it 110-105 before DeAndre Jordan missed two free throws for Los Angeles and Houston held on for the win.

Jamal Crawford led the Clippers with 24 points and Paul and Jordan had 22 apiece in a game that had 15 lead changes and was tied 16 times.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
MILWAUKEE (AP) -- Michael Carter-Williams ran into a wall of taller defenders on a drive into the lane and curled a pass into the corner to an open teammate.

Khris Middleton drained a 3-pointer - just the kind of play the Milwaukee Bucks were hoping to get when they traded for the promising point guard from the Philadelphia 76ers.

John Henson scored 21 points, Carter-Williams had seven points and eight assists in his Milwaukee debut and the Bucks beat Philadelphia 104-88 on Wednesday night.

''I think I did pretty good. The minutes I was in there I found the open guy, took care of the ball and just tried to find these guys and get them open shots,'' Carter-Williams said.

Middleton added 19 points for Milwaukee, which led by as many as 29. Jason Richardson scored 16 for the 76ers, who lost their fifth straight game.

It's not going to get any easier without Carter-Williams.

''I spent quality time with him and saw him grow on many levels,'' Sixers coach Brett Brown said about a pregame meeting with the guard. ''To come here and see him in a different uniform was awkward.''

Carter-Williams went from one of the NBA's worst teams to a surprising upstart vying for the playoffs. The 6-foot-6 floor general broke down defenders and used his long arms to guard on the perimeter.

''I didn't think he forced anything. I think he let the game come to him,'' coach Jason Kidd said.

The addition of Carter-Williams also moved Jerryd Bayless back to his regular role as a spark off the bench. Bayless, who finished with 13 points, and Henson were instrumental reserves in a 32-point second quarter that ended with the Bucks leading 61-32 at halftime.
</TEXT>



<TEXT>
MINNEAPOLIS (AP) -- His first game in a Timberwolves uniform in nearly eight years was 30 minutes away, and Kevin Garnett was bouncing off the walls in the locker room he called home for 12 years.

Minnesota owner Glen Taylor pulled him aside and tried to calm him down.

''This is your night, Kevin,'' Taylor told him. ''Just enjoy it.''

And it was.

Garnett made an ear-splitting return to Minnesota and his Timberwolves overcame a jittery start to beat Washington 97-77 on Wednesday night.

Garnett, reacquired in a trade from Brooklyn last week, had five points on 2-for-7 shooting with eight rebounds and two blocks in 19 minutes in his first game for Minnesota since 2007.

''I've been back before and I never paid attention to how much love is here still for me because I'm too busy being focused on the game,'' Garnett said about his previous games at Target Center with Boston and Brooklyn. ''And tonight it was just over the top.

''I did not know the city missed me like this. I don't think that you can ever wish or ever think the city loves you like this. But to see it is reality and I'm very appreciative.''

Standing ovation at the start. Serenaded at the finish. A storybook beginning to what Garnett has called a fairy tale ending to his career.

Kevin Martin scored 28 points and Andrew Wiggins had 19 for the Wolves, who trailed by 15 early after Garnett's stirring reintroduction.

Marcin Gortat had nine points and 15 rebounds for the Wizards, who have lost five in a row and 10 of their last 12. John Wall had five points on 2-for-10 shooting and 10 assists, and Paul Pierce missed the game with a bruised knee.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
DENVER (AP) -- Brandon Knight is showing off his shooting touch to his new teammates. His playmaking at crunch time, too.

Knight hit two key late 3-pointers and had 19 points to help the Phoenix Suns snap a five-game losing streak with a 110-96 victory over the injury-depleted Denver Nuggets on Wednesday night.

Acquired last week from Milwaukee in a three-team trade, Knight is averaging 17.3 points in three games with the Suns.

''He definitely fits in perfect,'' fellow guard Eric Bledsoe said.

Actually, Knight's still getting accustomed to his new surroundings - when to shoot, when to pass, that sort of thing.

''It's all new and all coming so quickly,'' Knight said. ''It will take time. But it's really just about making basketball plays.''

Bledsoe added 18 points for the Suns, 2-8 in their last 10 games. They had six players score in double figures as they ended a seven-game road skid. It's their first win away from home since Jan. 7 at Minnesota.

A big confidence boost heading into their home game against Oklahoma City on Thursday night. It's a team the Suns are chasing for a playoff spot in the Western Conference.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
SALT LAKE CITY (AP) -- Los Angele coach Byron Scott said Jordan Clarkson has been working on his mid-range jump shot recently. The rookie point guard showed the fruits of that labor Wednesday night as he helped rally the Lakers to a 100-97 victory over the Utah Jazz.

Clarkson scored a career-high 22 points and shot 62.5 percent from the field, helping eliminate the Jazz's hopes for their first three-game win streak of the season.

''I'm just trying to prove people wrong,'' Clarkson said. ''I've got a chip on my shoulder every time I step on the court. I was just playing aggressive. We were getting stops on the defensive end and getting out and making plays in transition. Just kind of one of those days where it was going for me. I was getting to my pull-up jump shot and it started falling for me.''

The Lakers (15-41) used a 10-0 run late in the fourth quarter to take their first lead at 90-88. The Jazz (21-35) failed to gets stops down the stretch and couldn't score on the offensive end after leading 82-69 with 11 minutes left in the game.

''I thought we kept our composure, we kept playing,'' Scott said. ''We've got a bunch of resilient guys. They just kept playing and giving us an opportunity.

''We're not going to quit and pack it in. That's not me. I'm glad it's not them. ... We make a ton of mistakes at times, but it's not because of a lack of effort.''

Gordon Hayward scored 20 for the Jazz, and Elijah Millsap finished with a career-high 17.

Jordan Hill scored 16 for the Lakers, while Wayne Ellington had 15 points and 10 rebounds.

''They brought energy,'' Millsap said. ''Our coaches had energy, our fans had energy. This one's just on us.''
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
SACRAMENTO, Calif. (AP) -- Three technical fouls were called. One chair was kicked, and two of the NBA's most volatile big men nearly let their emotions get the best of them.

It was just the kind of game the Memphis Grizzlies love to play.

The Sacramento Kings showed they can, too.

Rudy Gay scored 28 points, DeMarcus Cousins finished with 16 points and nine rebounds, and the Kings grinded out a 102-90 win over the Grizzlies on Wednesday night.

''Memphis does this to everybody, and they usually win,'' new Kings coach George Karl said. ''We had a chance to lose the game and our guys just said, 'No.'''

Cousins overcame foul trouble - and a confrontation with Grizzlies power forward Zach Randolph in the third quarter - to lead Sacramento's 10-0 spurt to start the fourth. Cousins added six assists in just 24 minutes before fouling out, getting the best of a championship-contending team for at least one night.

The Kings improved to 2-1 since Karl took over as coach.

Randolph had 20 points and five rebounds, and Marc Gasol added 14 points and seven boards as Memphis' climb up the Western Conference standings was slowed. The Grizzlies had won 16 of 19 to get within striking distance of Golden State, which leads the West by four games.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
PORTLAND, Ore. (AP) -- Wesley Matthews and the Portland Trail Blazers hope they put their recent fourth-quarter woes behind them Wednesday night.

Matthews scored 31 points, LaMarcus Aldridge had 11 points and 13 rebounds, and Portland beat the slumping San Antonio Spurs 111-95 for its first victory since the All-Star break.

The Trail Blazers are 25-4 when leading after three quarters, but all four losses have come in the past 10 games. The most glaring flop was Sunday, when Portland blew a 13-point lead as Memphis outscored the Blazers 34-15 during the fourth period.

Portland had an 81-71 lead heading into the fourth quarter against the Spurs, and the home crowd had reason to gasp when San Antonio opened the period with consecutive 3-pointers by Danny Green and Tony Parker that sliced the margin to four.

But in a matter of 3 minutes, Portland ended the drama by blitzing San Antonio with a 14-2 run that made it 95-79.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
CLEVELAND (AP) -- LeBron James says he isn't about personal statements. He made one anyway Thursday night.

James scored a season-high 42 points and the Cleveland Cavaliers beat the Golden State Warriors 110-99 for their 18th victory in 20 games.

James added 11 rebounds, outplaying fellow MVP candidate Stephen Curry and leading Cleveland past the team with the NBA's best record for its 11th straight home victory.

James downplayed any talk that the performance may put him in the lead for MVP consideration.

''That's not why I'm here,'' he said. ''I've got to be the MVP for these guys, the 14 guys in the locker room. When I'm on the floor I'll try to do everything I can to help this team win.''

The Cavaliers did get a bit of bad news. All-Star guard Kyrie Irving, who scored 24 points, injured his left shoulder and didn't travel with the team to Indiana for Friday night's game. A team spokesman said Irving will have an MRI on Friday and is doubtful against the Pacers.

Irving left the game in the third quarter and went to the locker room, but returned early in the fourth.

Curry scored 18 points, but had only six after the first quarter and was 5 of 17 from the field.
</TEXT>



<TEXT>
PHOENIX (AP) -- Point guard matchups don't get much better than the one Thursday night in Phoenix.

Russell Westbrook got the triple-double, Eric Bledsoe got the victory.

Westbrook scored 39 points in his 12th career triple-double but missed what would have been the game-tying layup with 5.7 seconds left in overtime, and the Suns beat Oklahoma City 117-113 to snap the Thunder's seven-game winning streak.

''It was an epic battle,'' Phoenix's P.J. Tucker said. ''They both played really well, we just came out on top.''

Bledsoe just missed a triple-double with 28 points, 13 rebounds and nine assists. He took 22 fewer shots than Westbrook and made one fewer basket.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
MIAMI (AP) -- Goran Dragic and the Miami Heat knew it would take some time for him to become acclimated to his new surroundings.

Looks like about three days did the trick.

Luol Deng made 11 of 14 shots and scored 29 points, Dragic added 23 points and 10 assists, and the Heat set a season high for scoring in a 119-108 victory over the Philadelphia 76ers on Monday night.

''I know my game now,'' said Deng, who has scored 20 or more eight times this season - and Miami is a perfect 8-0 in those games. ''I don't try to do too much with the ball. As long as the ball moves, we're a better team. ... We're at our best when the ball is moving.''

It was a good-news day all around for Miami. Heat coach Erik Spoelstra said before the game that Chris Bosh - who has blood clots on a lung, a season-ending issue - will be going home ''soon'' from a hospital where he's been treated since late last week.

Dwyane Wade scored 18 for the Heat, who stayed in the No. 7 spot in the Eastern Conference. Hassan Whiteside added 12 points and 14 rebounds for Miami, which shot 55 percent.

''Guys were starting to feed off each other, moving the ball,'' Spoelstra said. ''It's something we talked about endlessly the last few days.''

Hollis Thompson scored 22 points for Philadelphia, which got 18 from Nerlens Noel, 16 from Robert Covington, 12 from Henry Sims and 11 from Isaiah Canaan.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
NEW ORLEANS (AP) -- Pelicans coach Monty Williams now has a better idea of how badly his undermanned squad wants to stay in the Western Conference playoff race.

Alexis Ajinca capped a 16-point performance with a go-ahead layup in the final minute, and New Orleans erased an 18-point deficit en route to a 100-97 victory over the Toronto Raptors on Monday night.

''A lot of character being displayed on the floor,'' said Williams, whose squad pulled out its largest comeback this season without All-Star Anthony Davis and two other top players in uniform. ''It was a total team effort. You don't get to say that a lot when you're coaching sports, but tonight was for sure.''

Luke Babbitt scored a season-high 18 for New Orleans, including a 3-pointer that gave the Pelicans their first lead of the game with 1:55 left.

The clutch outings by the two reserves helped New Orleans overcome the absence of Davis (sprained right shoulder) and fellow forward Ryan Anderson (sprained right knee), who were both injured Saturday night in Miami - not to mention point guard Jrue Holiday (lower right leg injury), who hasn't played since Jan. 12.

''We never gave up. We stick to the plan, stay together and keep fighting,'' Ajinca said.

Newly acquired Norris Cole scored 15 for New Orleans. Omer Asik added 14 points and 11 rebounds, and Tyreke Evans had 13 points and 12 assists.

Kyle Lowry scored 22 for Toronto, but missed a driving layup for the lead with 6 seconds left when he was blocked by Asik, who also snared the rebound. Jimmer Fredette then hit a pair of free throws for New Orleans, and Lowry's 27-foot attempt for a tie missed.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
CHICAGO (AP) -- The shooting was terrible, all night long. The difference was the Chicago Bulls went to the glass, over and over again.

Tony Snell scored 20 points, Nikola Mirotic had 16 points and a career-high 14 rebounds, and the surging Bulls pounded the Milwaukee Bucks on the boards on their way to an 87-71 victory Monday.

Pau Gasol added 15 points and 10 rebounds as the Bulls enjoyed a whopping 62-41 advantage on the glass. Joakim Noah had eight points and 16 rebounds on his bobblehead night, and Jimmy Butler finished with 11 points and nine boards.

''Good work on the glass,'' Gasol said. ''I mean, they played small most of the time, so that kind of facilitates things on the rebounding end. But good activity, good effort on our part.''

Milwaukee shot 34 percent (30 for 89) from the field in its second straight loss after a stretch of nine wins in 10 games. Ersan Ilyasova had 15 points and 11 rebounds in his first start since Jan. 27 at Miami.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
HOUSTON (AP) -- James Harden focused on getting his teammates involved until he got himself going.

Harden had 31 points, 11 rebounds and 10 assists for his second triple-double this season, leading the Houston Rockets to a 113-102 victory over the Minnesota Timberwolves on Monday night.

Harden missed his first seven shots but got going late in the first quarter. He said when his shots aren't falling, it helps him to find his teammates open.

''When I get my teammates confident to shoot their shots and be aggressive and get them in their rhythm, I can get into mine and that makes everything easy,'' Harden said.

Harden had 13 points at halftime and was a rebound away from wrapping up his fourth career triple-double entering the fourth. When he juked Ricky Rubio with a crossover that sent the defender stumbling to the court and stepped back to swish a 3-pointer to end the third, it was clear that it was his night.

Houston led by nine at the start of the final period, but Andrew Wiggins led a charge that cut the lead to one point with less than 4 minutes left.

The Rockets took over after that, using a 14-2 run, with five points from Harden, to make it 111-98 with less than a minute to go.

''We had to get good shots and rebound the basketball and get stops and we did that at the right time,'' Harden said of the run that closed it out.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
DENVER (AP) -- Playing a smaller lineup paid off in a big way for the Brooklyn Nets.

Brook Lopez led seven Nets players in double figures with 19 points, and Brooklyn won its second consecutive road game by beating the Denver Nuggets 110-82 on Monday night.

Deron Williams added 16 points and 12 assists, and Thaddeus Young scored 15 in another solid outing for the Nets since his acquisition last week from Minnesota in a trade for Kevin Garnett.

Rookie guard Markel Brown had 11 rebounds and 10 points for the Nets in his first start of the season. Brooklyn, coming off a 114-105 victory at the Los Angeles Lakers last Friday, won back-to-back road games for the first time since mid-January.

''The court's a lot more open when we play small like this,'' Williams said. ''When you play 'Kel, when you play Cory (Jefferson), we're a lot more athletic. We can get out and run and that suits me.''

The Nets, focusing on their transition game, outscored the Nuggets 62-38 in the paint.

''We tried to be aggressive, move the ball side to side and share the ball,'' Lopez said.

Added coach Lionel Hollins: ''We are trying to establish how we are going to play. We had seven guys in double figures, and for as small as we are, we still dominated the glass.''

Danilo Gallinari had 22 points for the struggling Nuggets, who have lost 16 of 18 - including seven in a row at home. It matches their longest losing streak at the Pepsi Center since dropping seven straight from Feb. 6 to March 2, 2003.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
PHOENIX (AP) -- The stare and the smile said it all for Isaiah Thomas, who delightedly made his former team pay for trading him away just four days earlier.

Thomas scored eight of his 21 points in the last 1:37 Monday night in the Boston Celtics' 115-110 victory over the Phoenix Suns, delivering a critical four-point play, a steal and layup, and two free throws to defuse a rally.

The Suns traded Thomas to Boston last week in a deadline-day deal.

Thomas shot 6 of 16. His message was loud and clear after he glared at the Suns' bench following his 3-pointer, then offered a smile after his layup.

''It felt good to beat the team that traded you away,'' Thomas said. ''I just love the big moment. I want to be the hero.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
SALT LAKE CITY (AP) -- Utah Jazz coach Quin Snyder is trying to keep the Rudy Gobert love-fest under control. The 7-foot-1 Frenchman was already a fan favorite as a shot-swatting reserve, but the attention has increased since the organization traded away Enes Kanter and inserted Gobert into the starting lineup.

Gobert sparked another victory over a top team in his second consecutive start and the Jazz beat San Antonio 90-81 on Monday night, extending the Spurs' losing streak to three since returning from the All-Star hiatus.

''It's trying to build an identity,'' Snyder said. ''Guys are working. That's really what it all comes down to. It's nothing special.

''Rudy's been very good and (he) has an impact. It's more than Rudy. I'm taking nothing away from Rudy's presence. And his impact is significant. ... (But) everybody's trying to do their part. When you get that, it's no one player.''

Gobert set the defensive tone from the outset with two first-quarter blocks of Tim Duncan. He finished with seven points, 14 rebounds, three blocks and two steals as the Jazz have held their last five opponents under 100 points.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
LOS ANGELES (AP) -- The Memphis Grizzlies are on a roll with Jeff Green.

The Los Angeles Clippers aren't the same without Blake Griffin.

When the teams got together, they played a grind-it-out style better suited to the Grizzlies than the high-flying Clippers, whose four-game winning streak ended with a 90-87 loss Monday night.

Mike Conley scored 18 points, Jeff Green added 16 and Marc Gasol had 14 to help the Grizzlies improve to 15-3 since Green joined the team on Jan. 12.

''We just grind, play hard, play defense and play together,'' said Zach Randolph, who had 10 rebounds. ''There's nothing pretty about it. We don't have any high-fliers. We always play the same way, so it didn't matter if Blake was out there or not.''

It did to the Clippers, who still had their other late-game option in Chris Paul. But he lost the ball with 1.9 seconds left and bent over with his hands in his head.

''All I could think about was if I was watching at home this dummy didn't even get a shot up,'' said Paul, who had 30 points and 10 rebounds. ''I didn't execute on that last play. You try to thrive in those situations and for that to happen, it's tough.''
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
CHARLOTTE, N.C. (AP) -- After a busy week of roster shuffling, Russell Westbook finally got his first look at his new teammates on the floor.

When asked how the Thunder might look once players like Kyle Singler, Enes Kanter and D.J. Augustin get acquainted to the system and Kevin Durant and Steven Adams return to the lineup from injuries, Westbook couldn't help but break into a wide smile.

''Uh oh,'' Westbrook said, as if sending a message to the rest of the league.

With Durant resting his foot, Westbrook continued his hot play with 33 points and 10 assists, Serge Ibaka and Kanter added double-doubles and the Thunder defeated the Charlotte Hornets 110-103 on Saturday night for their fifth straight win.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
MIAMI (AP) -- Anthony Davis left in the opening minutes while clutching his shoulder in agony, and Ryan Anderson departed not long afterward with a knee injury.

Somehow, it still turned out to be a good night for New Orleans.

Eric Gordon scored 16 of his 24 points in the third quarter, Omer Asik added 15 and the Pelicans snapped a four-game slide by beating the emotionally drained Miami Heat 105-91 on Saturday night.

''When A.D. and Ryan went down I didn't see anybody buckle,'' New Orleans coach Monty Williams said. ''We beat a good team on their home floor.''

Mario Chalmers scored 20 points for Miami, which was playing for the first time since learning earlier in the day that All-Star forward Chris Bosh will miss the remainder of the season with blood clots on one of his lungs. It also spoiled the Miami debut of newly acquired guard Goran Dragic, a third-team All-NBA player with Phoenix last season.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
CHICAGO (AP) -- There is no doubt in Taj Gibson's mind the Chicago Bulls have the talent to win a title.

The question is: Do they have the focus?

Pau Gasol had 22 points and 14 rebounds and the Chicago Bulls beat the revamped Phoenix Suns 112-107 on Saturday night for their fifth victory in six games.

''The time is now,'' Gibson said. ''We've got no excuses. We have to make our adjustments now. Hopefully, tonight was one of those sparks.''

Too often, he said, the Bulls have been playing to their opponents' records. And that has resulted in some surprising losses.

In this one, they locked in at the end after it looked as if they might go down for the second time in two nights.

Jimmy Butler scored 19 points, Derrick Rose had 16, Mike Dunleavy Jr. 15, and Gibson and Aaron Brooks came on strong in the fourth quarter to finish with 12 points apiece.

''We're a versatile team,'' Gasol said. ''We're a flexible team that can be successful in different styles. But at the same time, we also have to understand what works best for us.''

P.J. Tucker led Phoenix with 20 points, and Marcus Morris had 17. Eric Bledsoe had 13 points, and so did Brandon Knight in his Suns debut, but Phoenix lost for the seventh time in eight games despite shooting over 53 percent.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
HOUSTON (AP) -- The Houston Rockets needed a spark against the Toronto Raptors to bounce back from a loss to Dallas in which they were so lethargic that coach Kevin McHale said it looked like they were wearing ''mud shoes.''

Corey Brewer provided that spark, coming off the bench to score a season-high 26 points and help the Rockets cruise to a 98-76 win on Saturday night.

James Harden scored 16 of his 20 points in Houston's big third quarter to help in the victory.

''Last night was a rough game,'' Brewer said of Friday's loss. ''We didn't have any energy coming back from the break and it bit us pretty bad. So I felt like I had to bring energy ... I tried to come out and play hard and everything worked out.''

Harden, who leads the NBA in scoring, got off to a tough start and had just four points by halftime. The Rockets led by four points with less than 4 minutes left in the third before going on a 12-1 run, with seven points from Harden, to take a 68-53 lead into the fourth and end his night.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
LOS ANGELES (AP) -- J.J. Redick scored 24 points, hitting four 3-pointers and all eight of his free throws, and the Los Angeles Clippers routed the Sacramento Kings 126-99 Saturday night for their fourth straight victory.

Austin Rivers had a career-high 28 points and fellow reserve Jamal Crawford scored 23 as the Clippers improved to 4-1 without injured All-Star Blake Griffin. DeAndre Jordan had 11 points and 15 rebounds.

Los Angeles trailed by 10 points in the first quarter, then took over in the second and cruised from there. The Clippers made 14 3-pointers, with Rivers tying his career high with five.

DeMarcus Cousins scored 21 points and Rudy Gay added 15 for the Kings, who have lost eight of 11. Coach George Karl was tagged with his first loss after winning his debut against Boston on Friday.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
ORLANDO, Fla. (AP) -- The Orlando Magic's season abruptly changed direction last week with the firing of former coach Jacque Vaughn.

There is still much to figure out before the end of the season, but they're hoping heading into the All-Star break on a winning note will be a good start.

Nik Vucevic had 28 points and 18 rebounds, and the Orlando Magic held off the New York Knicks 89-83 on Wednesday night.

''I think it was important for us mentally to go into the break with a win,'' Vucevic said. ''Everybody has a better feel now after the tough loss to Chicago and the tough loss to Washington.

''I think we played well defensively. That's what got us the win.''

The victory stopped a two-game skid by the Magic. It also improved interim coach James Borrego's record to 2-2 since taking over for Vaughn.

Victor Oladipo added 19 points and Willie Green 13 off the bench. Reserve Dewyane Dedmon also made a big contribution, blocking a career-high six shots in his 20 minutes of action. He fouled out, but it was the overall toughness Dedmon brought that Borrego said he hopes will carry over.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
BOSTON (AP) -- Boston Celtics coach Brad Stevens wasn't about to put too much importance on his team's comeback victory over the Eastern Conference-leading Atlanta Hawks.

''For 47 minutes, 59.8 seconds, we were the losing team,'' Stevens said on Wednesday night after Evan Turner's scoop shot with 0.2 seconds left gave the Celtics their only lead and lifted them to an 89-88 victory over the Hawks.

It was just Atlanta's third loss of the calendar year, but all three have come in the last 10 days following a 19-game winning streak that propelled them to the NBA's best record.

''I don't think they played their best game,'' Stevens said. ''They've been on the road for three games; they've had a miraculous couple of months of basketball. They missed some shots late, and we were fortunate.''

Jared Sullinger had 17 points and 15 rebounds for the Celtics, who have won four of five. Turner had 12 points, nine assists and seven rebounds.

Al Horford scored 22 points and added 12 rebounds for the Hawks, who still have the most wins in the NBA. They will send an NBA record-tying four players to the All-Star Game in New York; the last team to place four players on the All-Star roster was Boston, in 2011.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
AUBURN HILLS, Mich. (AP) -- With Gregg Popovich's 1,000th victory out of the way, San Antonio had one more game before the All-Star break.

The Spurs won it in routine fashion.

Danny Green scored 19 points and Tony Parker added 17, and San Antonio easily brushed aside the Detroit Pistons 104-87 on Wednesday night. Manu Ginobili added 13 points for the Spurs, who won this game amid little fanfare after Popovich reached his milestone two days earlier.

San Antonio has played three straight road games and won two. The Spurs play six more road games in a row after the break.

''Great way to finish,'' Parker said. ''We wanted to do three for three, but couldn't hit a shot against Toronto. We'll take two and enjoy the break and make sure we're ready when we get back.''

The Spurs held Detroit to 12 points in the first quarter and led comfortably through just about the entire second half.

''I don't usually give those guys a break after a loss, but we fought hard tonight. I thought we were just a step slow,'' Pistons coach Stan Van Gundy said. ''They are tired right now. I don't know if we need six days, but we definitely need a break.''

D.J. Augustin scored 22 points for the Pistons and Kentavious Caldwell-Pope added 20, but Detroit simply looked overmatched for most of the night. The Spurs led 48-39 at halftime and then went on a 16-7 run at the start of the third quarter.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
TORONTO (AP) -- Raptors guard DeMar DeRozan only hit one shot in the fourth quarter Wednesday night.

It turns out, one was enough.

DeRozan hit a tiebreaking jump shot with 12 seconds left and Toronto headed into the All-Star break on a winning note, beating the Wizards 95-93.

DeRozan was nearly stripped by John Wall on the decisive play but held on to hit the winner over the outstretched arm of Paul Pierce.

''As long as I knew I could get a shot off, I knew it had a chance of going in,'' DeRozan said.

Getting the best of Pierce, whose block on Lowry in the dying seconds of Game 7 of last year's first round ended Toronto's season, was particularly sweet.

''I'll put that one in the archives and look back at it a long time from now,'' DeRozan said.

Lou Williams scored 27 points, DeRozan had 23 and Kyle Lowry 13 for the Raptors, who have won seven of the past eight meetings with the Wizards, including all three this season.

Greivis Vasquez scored 11 points for the Raptors, who won their third straight and fourth of six. Toronto, which leads the Atlantic Division, improved to 21-9 at home and heads into the break at 36-17, second to Atlanta in the Eastern Conference. It's Toronto's best record at All-Star weekend in the team's 20-year history.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
NEW ORLEANS (AP) -- Playing on the court where he made his name as an elite NBA power forward, David West looked ruthlessly efficient once again, draining nearly every jump shot he took from as far as 20 feet.

Hitting eight of his nine shots, West scored 17 points, and the Indiana Pacers went into the All-Star break with their fourth victory in five games, pounding the New Orleans Pelicans 106-93 on Wednesday night.

Now the Pacers' 11-year veteran can recharge for a playoff push that didn't look all that realistic earlier this season.

''We're getting there. We're giving ourselves a fighting chance,'' said West, whose Pacers (21-33) pulled just two games behind Charlotte and Miami for the final playoff spot in the Eastern Conference. ''We'll try to come back refreshed, and try to keep playing this style of basketball where we're just sharing the ball, approaching games with the right attitude.''

George Hill scored 17 and Rodney Stuckey 16 for the Pacers, who led by as many as 23 points in the first half before widening the lead to as many as 33 early in the fourth.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
CLEVELAND (AP) -- Seconds before the opening tip, LeBron James pulled Chris Bosh close and tightly hugged his former teammate.

The pleasantries ended there.

From then on, James treated the Miami Heat like any other team.

James scored 18 points against his former teammates and Cleveland had six others score in double figures as the Cavaliers beat the Heat 113-93 Wednesday night for their 14th win in 15 games.

Timofey Mozgov scored 20 and Tristan Thomson 17 in Cleveland's final home game before the All-Star break. The Cavs, who have climbed in the standings after a sluggish start, will play at Chicago on Thursday before the season's extended respite.
</TEXT>


<TEXT>
MILWAUKEE (AP) -- Brandon Knight certainly looked like an All-Star.

Many believe the Milwaukee guard had a strong case for inclusion in this weekend's All-Star game in New York. He scored 20 points - including the Bucks' last 10 in a third-quarter surge - leading Milwaukee to a 111-103 victory over a Sacramento Kings team on the brink of yet another coaching change on Wednesday night.

''B-Knight's playing at an All-Star level,'' Bucks coach Jason Kidd said. ''When he has the ball, we always feel like something good's going to happen.''

There are no such good feelings these days for the Kings. DeMarcus Cousins had 28 points and 19 rebounds for a team about to make its second coaching change of the season.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
MINNEAPOLIS (AP) -- After a first 51 games unlike any other in franchise history, the Golden State Warriors need a rest.

That much was clear in their final game before the All-Star break, when they had to grind out their 42nd win of the season against the Minnesota Timberwolves.

Andre Iguodala and Leandro Barbosa led a dominant effort from the Warriors' reserves and Klay Thompson hit a big 3-pointer down the stretch to close out a long road trip with a 94-91 victory over the Timberwolves on Wednesday night.

Iguodala scored just eight points on 4-for-4 shooting and Barbosa had 10 points, but they spearheaded an energized second unit that picked up the slack for their sluggish starters. Stephen Curry had 25 points on 9-for-23 shooting for Golden State (42-9), which goes into the break with the best record in the NBA.

''Amazing. Amazing record,'' Kerr said of the franchise-best start. ''Really proud of the guys, and I've never seen a group of guys that needed the All-Star break more than this team. We're so out of whack right now. We're tired. We're not making our cuts. We're not getting good shots for each other. The ball has stopped moving and we need a rest, and fortunately we'll get one.''

Kevin Martin scored 21 points and Ricky Rubio had 18 points, nine rebounds and five assists for the Timberwolves (11-42), who rallied from a 14-point deficit in the fourth quarter to tie the game.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
OKLAHOMA CITY (AP) -- The Thunder put an exclamation point on their hot streak heading into the All-Star break.

Kevin Durant scored 26 points and Russell Westbrook added 24 to help Oklahoma City defeat the Memphis Grizzlies 105-89 on Wednesday night.

Nick Collison had season highs of 15 points and nine rebounds and Dion Waiters added 11 points for Oklahoma City, which has won five of six. The Thunder have fought through a rough start that followed early injuries to Durant and Westbrook and now are within a half-game of the No. 8 position in the Western Conference standings.

''We try not to think about that,'' Durant said. ''We're just trying to play good basketball and that will take care of itself. We're excited that we're going into the break with a 'W.' You'd rather go into the break beating a good team like Memphis.''

Zach Randolph scored 16 points and Jeff Green and Beno Udrih each added 11 for Memphis, which had won 10 of 11. All-Star Marc Gasol finished with just eight points on 2-for-10 shooting. Oklahoma City successfully limited Memphis' inside game and held the Grizzlies to 37 percent shooting.
</TEXT>



<TEXT>
DALLAS (AP) -- J.J. Barea enjoyed a pleasant surprise when Monta Ellis lined up beside him in the backcourt after it looked as if Dallas' leading scorer would have to sit with a left hip injury.

The diminutive guard from Puerto Rico took over offensively anyway.

Barea scored 15 of his season-high 22 points in the third quarter and the Mavericks went into the All-Star break by holding on for a ragged 87-82 victory against the Utah Jazz on Wednesday night.

''I knew we needed a little burst there,'' said the 6-foot Barea, who darted past defenders for layups and made four of seven 3-pointers. ''Our defense was good, but we were struggling on offense.''

Starting while Rajon Rondo recovers from a broken orbital bone, Barea was happy to see Ellis, and so were the rest of the Mavericks, even though he scored just seven points while taking just six shots.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
PORTLAND, Ore. (AP) -- The Portland Trail Blazers were more concerned about themselves than the struggling Los Angeles Lakers.

Wary of a letdown following a win on the road and with the All-Star break looming, the Blazers jumped on the Lakers early and never let up in a 102-86 victory Wednesday night.

The loss was the 11th straight on the road for the Lakers, a franchise record.

''We were focused,'' Portland's Nicolas Batum said. ''Those games can sometimes be like a trap or tricky game, and maybe we could focus on the break. But we were focused. We knew we had a job to do tonight.''

LaMarcus Aldridge had 18 points and 12 rebounds, while Wesley Matthews added 20 points for the Blazers, who won their second straight before heading into the break.
</TEXT>

<TEXT>
LOS ANGELES (AP) -- DeAndre Jordan has recorded at least 20 points and 20 rebounds in three of the Los Angeles Clippers' last six games - something he wasn't able to do in any of his 511 previous regular-season and playoff games in the NBA.

Yet, he'll be watching the All-Star game at home.

Jordan powered the two-time defending Pacific Division champions to a 110-95 victory over the Houston Rockets on Wednesday night with 24 points and 20 boards.

The seventh-year center, whose 22 points and career-high 27 rebounds powered the Clippers to a 115-98 victory at Dallas on Monday night, shot 6 for 8 from the field to extend his NBA-record streak to 39 consecutive games shooting at least 50 percent. He also was 12 for 26 from the free throw line.
</TEXT>



<TEXT>
NEW YORK (AP) -- Steve Kerr didn't paint a pretty picture of his Madison Square Garden coaching debut.

''That was tough to watch,'' he said.

''It was a really bad show,'' he added later.

Luckily for him, it's only one night. Had he chosen the Knicks job, it would be his season.

Draymond Green had 20 points and 13 rebounds, and the Golden State Warriors beat New York 106-92 on Saturday night to give Kerr a win in his first game coaching in the arena he nearly called home.

Stephen Curry scored 22 points and Klay Thompson had 16 on a night neither shot well. But the Warriors have plenty of weapons even when their All-Stars struggle, one of the many reasons Kerr never needs question the decision he made last summer when he chose between two job openings.

He picked the Warriors over the Knicks, and the difference is 30 victories as the teams near the All-Star break.

Langston Galloway scored 15 points for the Knicks, who gave Carmelo Anthony a night off and lost their third straight. The All-Star forward who has dealt with a sore left knee much of the season rested on the second night of back-to-back games.

The Knicks trailed by as much as 26 without him, but cut it to five in the fourth quarter before Curry made a couple of 3-pointers down the stretch.

''We feel like we could play better. We were a little fatigued and it kind of showed but that shouldn't be an excuse for how we executed on both ends of the floor,'' Curry said. ''Just wasn't our greatest of games but we found a way to win down the stretch.''

Kerr was considered the leading candidate to coach the Knicks from nearly the moment Phil Jackson was hired as team president in March. They continued talking about the job into the spring, and Jackson said Kerr verbally committed to it before telling him he wanted to pursue the Warriors job instead after they fired Mark Jackson.

That allowed him to stay close to his family, not to mention inherit a playoff team, but Kerr said breaking the news to his former coach was tough.

''It was difficult because I'm very, very close with him and I feel like I'm indebted to him for much of what's transpired in my career,'' Kerr said.

The difficult choice was the correct one.

Golden State improved to 40-9, tops in the Western Conference, while the Knicks fell to 10-41.

The Warriors, coming off a 124-116 loss at NBA-leading Atlanta on Friday night, led 32-19 after one even though Curry and Thompson missed 10 of their 12 shots. It seemed like an easy night when Thompson's jumper made it 89-63 with 3:08 left in the third.

But the lead was down to 95-90 after Shane Larkin's steal and layup with a little more than 4 minutes remaining. The Warriors then scored six straight, with Curry's 3-pointer making it 101-90 with 2:52 to play.

''We were horrible but last three minutes we decided to guard and we shut them down and we avoided disaster,'' Kerr said.

Curry had a career-best 54 points here two years ago and a triple-double last year, but had no assists and couldn't get the crowd buzzing much Saturday. Nor could fellow All-Star Thompson, who shot 5 for 22.
</TEXT>

